Louisiana, session 2026, SB320.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:605.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§605.1. Outstanding CODIS hit data; reporting
A. The legislature recognizes the importance of improving the collective
response of the criminal justice system to criminal investigations, including
sexual assault investigations; therefore, measures shall be taken to create
accountability in the CODIS hit notification and resolution process. Tracking
of outstanding CODIS hits is essential to ensuring that scientific work done in
the crime laboratories successfully translates into justice in the state, and that
future convictions or exonerations in older cases are not lost or buried under
new caseloads.
B. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "CODIS hit" means a confirmed database match that aids a criminal
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 320 ENROLLED
investigation and one or more of the investigations involved in the match are
unsolved.
(2) "CODIS hit notification" means a formal communication sent by a
CODIS-participating laboratory to a criminal justice agency when a DNA
profile from an unsolved case is confirmed to have matched a DNA profile
already in the CODIS database.
(3)"CODIS hit resolution" means that an agency has taken steps to
determine if the investigative lead provided by the CODIS-participating
laboratory is probative to the case at hand. The ultimate disposition of the
CODIS hit should be either a communication to the CODIS-participating
laboratory that the lead has been exhausted or that the lead has probative value
and shall be followed up on by collection and submission of a reference DNA
sample to the laboratory from the associated individual, if applicable.
(4)"Outstanding CODIS hit" means that a criminal justice agency has
officially received a CODIS hit notification and that investigative lead has not
been cleared, acted upon, or resolved by that agency within ninety days of
receipt.
C. The state police shall serve as the central repository for tracking of
outstanding CODIS hits in Louisiana.
D. The state police shall create and operate a statewide outstanding
CODIS hit tracking system. The state police may contract with public or private
entities, including but not limited to private software and technology providers,
for the creation and maintenance of the system.
E. The statewide outstanding CODIS hit tracking system shall
accomplish all of the following:
(1) Track the status of the CODIS hits sent to criminal justice agencies
that have not been resolved within ninety days.
(2) Allow criminal justice agencies to update and track the status of
outstanding CODIS hits.
(3) Use electronic technology in order to allow continuous access.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 320 ENROLLED
(4) Provide for cross-jurisdictional data sharing with law enforcement
agencies.
F. The state police may use a phased implementation process in order to
launch the system and facilitate entry and use of the system for required
participants. The state police may phase in initial participation according to the
region or volume.
G. All law enforcement agencies that receive CODIS hit notifications,
including CODIS-participating laboratories, investigating law enforcement
agencies, district attorneys' offices, and agencies that aid in the identification of
missing persons and human remains, shall provide all required information to
the tracking system and fully participate in the system no later than January 1,
2027.
H.(1) After implementation of the tracking system, the state police shall
submit an annual report on the statewide outstanding CODIS hit tracking
system to the Senate Committee on Judiciary C, the House Committee on
Administration of Criminal Justice, the governor, and the David R. Poynter
Legislative Research Library pursuant to R.S. 24:771 and 772 no later than
March first of each year. The state police shall make public the current report
on its website. The report shall include all of the following:
(a) The total number of outstanding CODIS hits in the system statewide
and by jurisdiction.
(b) The number of outstanding CODIS hits added to the system in the
reporting period statewide and by jurisdiction.
(c) The total number of outstanding CODIS hits that have been resolved
in the system statewide and by jurisdiction.
(2) For the purpose of the report required by this Subsection, an
outstanding CODIS hit shall be assigned to the jurisdiction associated with both
the CODIS-participating laboratory who processed the evidence associated with
the unsolved case that received the CODIS hit, as well as the criminal justice
agency that submitted the applicable evidence to the CODIS-participating
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 320 ENROLLED
laboratory.
I. The state police shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the
provisions of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.